Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.304

Central College fund—Other revenue for support of Central Washington University.

No revenue from any source other than the general fund, which, except for the provisions hereof, would have been paid into the Central College fund, shall be used for any purpose except the support of the Central Washington University (formerly Central Washington State College).

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 106; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.304. Prior: 1955 c 333 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.